lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Žolės riedulys ir lakrosas: Žolės riedulio ir lakroso krepšiai; Žolės riedulio ir lakroso apsauginės priemonės; Žolės riedulio ir lakroso bateliai; Žolės riedulio kamuoliukai; Žolės riedulio įrangos rinkiniai; Žolės riedulio vartai; Žolės riedulio lazdos; Žolės riedulio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Lakroso kamuoliukai; Lakroso įrangos rinkiniai; Lakroso vartai; Lakroso lazdų dalys; Lakroso lazdos; Lakroso treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Χόκεϊ επί χόρτου & λακρός: Τσάντες χόκεϊ επί χόρτου και λακρός; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός χόκεϊ & λακρός; Παπούτσια χόκεϊ & λακρός; Μπάλες χόκεϊ επί χόρτου; Σετ εξοπλισμού χόκεϊ επί χόρτου; Τέρματα χόκεϊ επί χόρτου; Μπαστούνια χόκεϊ επί χόρτου; Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα χόκεϊ επί χόρτου; Μπάλες λακρός; Σετ εξοπλισμού λακρός; Τέρματα λακρός; Εξαρτήματα ροπάλου λακρός; Μπαστούνια λακρός; Προπονητικά βοηθήματα λακρός
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 草地曲棍球/袋棍球: 曲棍球與袋棍球裝備袋; 草地曲棍球/袋棍球護具; 曲棍球/袋棍球鞋; 草地曲棍球; 曲棍球裝備套組; 草地曲棍球球門; 草地曲棍球棍; 曲棍球訓練輔助工具; 袋棍球用球; 袋棍球裝備組; 袋棍球球門; 袋棍球桿零件; 袋棍球棒; 袋棍球訓練輔助用品
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Hockey sur gazon et lacrosse: Sacs de hockey sur gazon et de crosse; Équipement de protection de hockey sur gazon et lacrosse; Chaussures de hockey sur gazon et de lacrosse; Balles de hockey sur gazon; Kits d'équipement de hockey sur gazon; Buts de hockey sur gazon; Crosses de hockey sur gazon; Aides à l'entraînement au hockey sur gazon; Balles de lacrosse; Équipement de lacrosse; Buts de lacrosse; Pièces pour bâtons de lacrosse; Crosses de lacrosse; Matériel d'entraînement de lacrosse
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Pozemní hokej a lakros: Tašky na pozemní hokej a lakros; Ochranné vybavení na pozemní hokej a lakros; Boty na pozemní hokej a lakros; Míčky na pozemní hokej; Sady vybavení na pozemní hokej; Branky na pozemní hokej; Hokejky na pozemní hokej; Tréninkové pomůcky pro pozemní hokej; Lakrosové míčky; Sady vybavení na lakros; Lakrosové branky; Díly lakrosových holí; Lakrosové hole; Tréninkové pomůcky na lakros
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Хокей на трева и лакрос: Протектори за тялото за хокей на трева и лакрос; Защитна екипировка за хокей на трева и лакрос; Обувки за хокей на трева и лакрос; Топки за хокей на трева; Комплекти оборудване за хокей на трева; Врати за хокей на трева; Стикове за хокей на трева; Помощни средства за тренировка по хокей на трева; Топки за лакрос; Комплекти оборудване за лакрос; Врати за лакрос; Части за стик за лакрос; Стикове за лакрос; Помощни средства за тренировка по лакрос
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Landhockey och lacrosse: Väskor för landhockey och lacrosse; Skyddsutrustning för landhockey och lacrosse; Landhockey- och lacrossesskor; Landhockeybollar; Utrustningsset för landhockey; Landhockeymål; Landhockeyklubbor; Träningshjälpmedel för landhockey; Lacrossebollar; Lacrosse-utrustning; Lacrossemål; Delar till lacrosseklubbor; Lacrosseklubbor; Lacrosseträningsutrustning
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 필드하키/라크로스: 필드 하키 및 라크로스 가방; 필드하키/라크로스 보호 장비; 필드하키/라크로스화; 필드하키 공; 필드 하키 장비 세트; 필드하키 골대; 필드하키 스틱; 필드하키 훈련 장비; 라크로스 공; 라크로스 장비 세트; 라크로스 골대; 라크로스 스틱 부품; 라크로스 스틱; 라크로스 훈련 장비
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Hockey su prato e lacrosse: Borse da hockey su prato e lacrosse; Protezioni per hockey su prato e lacrosse; Scarpe da hockey su prato e lacrosse; Palline da hockey su prato; Set di attrezzatura da hockey su prato; Porte da hockey su prato; Mazze da hockey su prato; Ausili per l'allenamento dell'hockey su prato; Palline da lacrosse; Set di attrezzature per lacrosse; Porte da lacrosse; Parti di mazze lacrosse; Mazze da lacrosse; Attrezzatura di allenamento per lacrosse
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィールドホッケー・ラクロス用品: フィールドホッケー・ラクロス用バッグ; フィールドホッケー・ラクロス用プロテクター; フィールドホッケー・ラクロスシューズ; フィールドホッケー用ボール; フィールドホッケー用具セット; フィールドホッケー用ゴール; フィールドホッケー用スティック; フィールドホッケー練習器具; ラクロスボール; ラクロス用品セット; ラクロス用ゴール; ラクロススティックパーツ; ラクロススティック; ラクロス練習器具
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Hokej na travi in lacrosse: Vreče za hokej na travi in lacrosse; Zaščitna oprema za hokej na travi in lacrosse; Obutev za hokej na travi in lacrosse; Žogice za hokej na travi; Kompleti opreme za hokej na travi; Goli za hokej na travi; Palice za hokej na travi; Pripomočki za vadbo hokeja na travi; Lacrosse žoge; Kompleti opreme za lacrosse; Goli za lacrosse; Deli za lacrosse palice; Lacrosse palice; Pripomočki za vadbo lacrossa
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Hokej na trawie i lacrosse: Torby do hokeja na trawie i lacrosse; Ochraniacze do hokeja na trawie i lacrosse; Buty do gry w hokeja na trawie i lacrosse; Piłki do hokeja na trawie; Zestawy sprzętu do hokeja na trawie; Bramki do hokeja na trawie; Kije do hokeja na trawie; Pomoce treningowe do hokeja na trawie; Piłki do lacrosse; Zestawy do lacrosse; Bramki do lacrosse; Części kijów do lacrosse; Kije do lacrosse; Sprzęt treningowy do lacrosse
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Field Hockey & Lacrosse: Field Hockey & Lacrosse Bags; Field Hockey & Lacrosse Protective Gear; Field Hockey & Lacrosse Shoes; Field Hockey Balls; Field Hockey Equipment Sets; Field Hockey Goals; Field Hockey Sticks; Field Hockey Training Aids; Lacrosse Balls; Lacrosse Equipment Sets; Lacrosse Goals; Lacrosse Stick Parts; Lacrosse Sticks; Lacrosse Training Aids
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 陆上曲棍球/长曲棍球: 曲棍球与长曲棍球包; 陆上曲棍球/长曲棍球护具; 陆上曲棍球/长曲棍球鞋; 曲棍球; 曲棍球装备套装; 曲棍球球门; 曲棍球杆; 曲棍球训练辅助用品; 长曲棍球用球; 长曲棍球装备套装; 长曲棍球门; 长曲棍球棒零件; 长曲棍球棒; 长曲棍球训练器材
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Hóquei de campo e lacrosse: Bolsas para hóquei em campo e lacrosse; Equipamento de proteção para hóquei de campo e lacrosse; Sapatos de hóquei de campo e lacrosse; Bolas de hóquei em campo; Conjuntos de equipamentos de hóquei em campo; Goleiras de hóquei em campo; Bastões de hóquei; Auxílios de treinamento para hóquei em campo; Bolas de lacrosse; Conjuntos de equipamento para lacrosse; Goleiras de lacrosse; Peças do bastão de lacrosse; Bastões de lacrosse; Equipamentos de treinamento de lacrosse
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ฮอกกี้บนพื้นหญ้าและลาครอส: กระเป๋าฟิลด์ฮอกกี้และลาครอสส์; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับฮอกกี้บนพื้นหญ้าและลาครอส; รองเท้าฮอกกี้สนามหญ้าและลาครอส; ลูกฮอกกี้สนามหญ้า; ชุดอุปกรณ์ฟิลด์ฮอกกี้; ประตูฮอกกี้บนพื้นหญ้า; ไม้ฮอกกี้สนามหญ้า; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมฮอกกี้สนาม; ลูกบอลลาครอส; ชุดอุปกรณ์ลาครอส; ประตูกีฬาลาครอส; ชิ้นส่วนไม้ลาครอส; ไม้ลาครอส; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมลาครอส
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Hochei pe iarbă și lacrosse: Genți pentru hochei pe iarbă și lacrosse; Echipament de protecție pentru hochei pe iarbă și lacrosse; Pantofi pentru hochei pe iarbă și lacrosse; Mingi pentru hochei pe iarbă; Seturi de echipamente pentru hochei pe iarbă; Porți pentru hochei pe iarbă; Crose pentru hochei pe iarbă; Articole antrenament pentru hochei pe iarbă; Mingi de lacrosse; Seturi de echipamente pentru lacrosse; Porți pentru lacrosse; Piese crose de lacrosse; Crose de lacrosse; Articole pentru antrenament lacrosse
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Landhockey og Lacrosse: Bager for landhockey og lacrosse; Beskyttelsesutstyr for landhocket og lacrosse; Sko til landhockey og lacrosse; Landhockeyballer; Utstyrssett for landhockey; Landhockeymål; Landhockeykøller; Treningshjelpemidler for landhockey; Lacrosseballer; Utstyrssett for lacrosse; Lacrossemål; Deler til lacrossekøller; Lacrossekøller; Læringsverktøy for lacrosse
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей на траве и лакросс: Сумки для хоккея на траве и лакросса; Защитная экипировка для хоккея на траве и лакросса; Обувь для хоккея на траве и лакросса; Мячи для хоккея на траве; Комплекты экипировки для хоккея на траве; Ворота для хоккея на траве; Клюшки для хоккея на траве; Тренировочный инвентарь для хоккея на траве; Мячи для лакросса; Наборы инвентаря для лакросса; Ворота для лакросса; Детали клюшек для лакросса; Клюшки для лакросса; Тренировочный инвентарь для лакросса
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Hokej na travi i lacrosse: Torbe za hokej na travi i lacrosse; Zaštitna oprema za hokej na travi i lacrosse; Tenisice za hokej na travi i lacrosse; Lopte za hokej na travi; Kompleti opreme za hokej na travi; Golovi za hokej na travi; Palice za hokej na travi; Oprema za trening hokeja na travi; Lopte za lacrosse; Kompleti opreme za lacrosse; Golovi za lacrosse; Dijelovi palice za lacrosse; Palice za lacrosse; Pomagala za lacrosse trening
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Gyeplabda és lacrosse: Gyeplabda és lacrosse táskák; Gyeplabda és lacrosse védőfelszerelés; Gyeplabda és lacrosse cipők; Gyeplabdalabdák; Gyeplabda felszerelés készletek; Gyeplabdakapuk; Gyeplabdabotok; Gyeplabda-edzéssegédek; Lacrosse labdák; Lacrosse felszereléskészletek; Lacrosse kapuk; Lacrosse botalkatrészek; Lacrosse botok; Lacrosse-edzési segédeszközök
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Çim Hokeyi ve Lakros: Çim hokeyi ve lakros çantaları; Çim Hokeyi ve Lakros Koruyucu Kıyafetleri; Çim Hokeyi ve Lacrosse Ayakkabıları; Çim Hokeyi Topları; Çim hokeyi ekipman setleri; Çim Hokeyi Kaleleri; Çim Hokeyi Sopaları; Çim Hokeyi Eğitim Araçları; Lakros Topları; Lakros Malzeme Setleri; Lakros Kaleleri; Lakros Sopası Parçaları; Lakros Sopaları; Lakros Eğitim Ekipmanları
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Hockey en lacrosse: Tassen voor veldhockey en lacrosse; Beschermende uitrusting voor hockey en lacrosse; Verldschoenen voor hockey en lacrosse; Hockeyballen; Uitrustingssets voor veldhockey; Veldhockeydoelen; Veldhockeysticks; Veldhockeytrainingshulpmiddelen; Lacrosseballen; Sets met lacrossebenodigdheden; Lacrossedoelen; Onderdelen voor lacrossesticks; Lacrossesticks; Benodigdheden voor lacrossetraining
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Feldhockey & Lacrosse: Taschen für Feldhockey & Lacrosse; Feldhockey- & Lacrosse-Schutzkleidung; Feldhockey- & Lacrosse-Schuhe; Feldhockeybälle; Ausrüstungssets für Feldhockey; Feldhockeytore; Feldhockeyschläger; Feldhockey-Trainingshilfen; Lacrosse-Bälle; Lacrosse-Ausrüstungen; Lacrosse-Tore; Lacrosse-Schlägerteile; Lacrosse-Schläger; Lacrosse-Trainingszubehör
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Khúc côn cầu trên cỏ và bóng vợt: Túi đựng đồ khúc côn cầu trên cỏ và lacrosse; Dụng cụ bảo vệ thi đấu bóng vợt và khúc côn cầu trên cỏ; Giày chơi khúc côn cầu trên cỏ và bóng vợt; Bóng dành cho khúc côn cầu trên cỏ; Bộ dụng cụ khúc côn cầu trên cỏ; Khung thành khúc côn cầu trên cỏ; Gậy khúc côn cầu trên cỏ; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện khúc côn cầu trên sân cỏ; Bóng vợt; Bộ thiết bị bóng vợt; Khung thành bóng vợt; Các bộ phận của gậy chơi bóng vợt; Cán bóng vợt; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập bóng vợt
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Maahockey ja lacrosse: Maahockey- ja lacrosse-kassit; Maahockeyn ja lacrossen suojukset; Maahockey- ja lacrossekengät; Maahockey-pallot; Maahockeyn varustesetit; Maahockey-maalit; Maahockey-mailat; Maahockeyn-harjoitteluvälineet; Lacrosse-pallot; Lacrosse-tarvikesetit; Lacrosse-maalit; Lacrosse-mailan osat; Lacrosse-mailat; Lacrosse-harjoitteluvälineet
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Lacrosse e hóquei em campo: Sacos de hóquei em campo e lacrosse; Equipamento de proteção para lacrosse e hóquei em campo; Calçado para lacrosse e hóquei em campo; Bolas de hóquei em campo; Conjuntos de equipamento de hóquei em campo; Balizas para hóquei em campo; Sticks de hóquei em campo; Auxiliares de treino para hóquei em campo; Bolas de lacrosse; Conjuntos de equipamento para lacrosse; Balizas para lacrosse; Peças para sticks de lacrosse; Sticks de lacrosse; Auxiliares de treino para lacrosse
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Lacrosse og udendørs hockey: Tasker til landhockey og lacrosse; Beskyttelsesudstyr til lacrosse og udendørs hockey; Sko til hockey og lacrosse; Bolde til udendørs hockey; Udstyrssæt til landhockey; Mål til udendørs hockey; Stave til udendørs hockey; Hjælpemidler til træning i hockey; Lacrosse-bolde; Udstyrssæt til lacrosse; Lacrosse-mål; Dele til lacrossestave; Lacrossestave; Træningsudstyr til lacrosse
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Pozemný hokej a lakros: Tašky na pozemný hokej a lakros; Ochranné vybavenie na pozemný hokej a lakros; Obuv na pozemný hokej a lakros; Lopty na pozemný hokej; Sady vybavenia na pozemný hokej; Bránky na pozemný hokej; Hokejky na pozemný hokej; Tréningové pomôcky pre pozemný hokej; Lakrosové lopty; Súpravy lakrosového vybavenia; Lakrosové bránky; Časti lakrosových palíc; Lakrosové palice; Lakrosové tréningové pomôcky
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Hockey sobre hierba y lacrosse: Bolsos para lacrosse y hockey sobre césped; Equipamiento de protección para hockey sobre hierba y lacrosse; Calzado de lacrosse y hockey sobre hierba; Pelotas de hockey sobre hierba; Sets de equipo de hockey sobre césped; Porterías de hockey sobre hierba; Palos de hockey sobre hierba; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de hockey sobre hierba; Pelotas de lacrosse; Conjuntos de equipamiento para lacrosse; Porterías de lacrosse; Piezas para palo de lacrosse; Palos de lacrosse; Material de entrenamiento de lacrosse